Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1804
Mandate, defined.

Mandate means a requirement imposed by a statute of the United States or the State of Nebraska, a rule, a regulation, an administrative or a judicial order, a licensing requirement or condition, any agreement with or requirement of a regional transmission organization, or any consent order or agreement between the United States or the State of Nebraska, or any agency thereof, and a public entity.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 4.